Utah statutes.
78B-6-123.   Power of a minor to consent or relinquish.

(1)  A minor parent has the power to:

(a)  consent to the adoption of the minor's child; and

(b)  relinquish the minor's control or custody of the child for adoption.

(2)  The consent or relinquishment described in Subsection (1) is valid and has the same force and effect as a consent or relinquishment executed by an adult parent.

(3)  A minor parent, having executed a consent or relinquishment, cannot revoke that consent upon reaching the age of majority or otherwise becoming emancipated.

